Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2560XS (2) 91 je/js S.F. 254 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 100B.51 Fire fighter equipment ââ 1 required label. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âFire fighter equipmentâ means clothing designed, 5 intended, or marketed to be a structural fire fighting 6 protective ensemble or ensemble element that includes coats, 7 trousers, coveralls, helmets, gloves, footwear, interface 8 components, and other components used to construct such 9 clothing. 10 b. âMunicipalityâ means the same as defined in section 11 100B.21. 12 c. âPerfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substancesâ means 13 any chemical of a class of fluorinated organic chemicals that 14 contains at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom and is used 15 in fire fighting agents. 16 2. On or after July 1, 2026, a municipality or fire 17 department shall not purchase fire fighter equipment unless 18 the fire fighter equipment contains a permanently affixed 19 label indicating whether the fire fighter equipment contains 20 perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. 21 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 22 3, shall not apply to this Act. 23